th: วงออร์เคสตราเลียตำแหน่งชิ้นส่วนเครื่องดนตรี: ฝั่งเบส; ตรงกลาง; ด้านหน้า; ซ้าย; ด้านล่าง; ไม่ระบุ; ด้านหลัง; ขวา; ฝั่งเทรเบิล; ด้านบน; อื่นๆ
zh-CN: 管弦乐弦乐器零件位置: 低音侧; 居中; 正面; 左侧; 下半部; 不适用; 背面; 右侧; 高音侧; 上半部; 其他
ja: オーケストラストリング楽器パート位置: 低音側; 中央; 前面; 左; 下部; 該当なし; 背面; 右; 高音側; 上部; その他
pt-PT: Posição da parte do instrumento da cadeia orquestral: Lado dos graves; Centro; Frente; Esquerda; Inferior; Não aplicável; Traseira; Direita; Lado dos agudos; Superior; Outro
de: Position des Teils am Orchesterstreichinstrument: Bassseite; Mitte; Vorne; Links; Unten; Nicht zutreffend; Hinten; Rechts; Diskantseite; Oben; Sonstige
bg-BG: Позиция на частта в струнен оркестров инструмент: Басова страна; Център; Предна; Лява; Долна; Не е приложимо; Задна; Дясна; Страна на високите тонове; Горна; Друго
hr-HR: Položaj dionice instrumenta orkestarske strune: Bas strana; Sredina; Prednji; Lijevi; Donji; Nije primjenjivo; Stražnji; Desni; Strana visokih tonova; Gornji; Ostalo
nl: Orkestraal snaarinstrument onderdeelpositie: Baskant; Midden; Voorkant; Links; Onder; Niet van toepassing; Achterkant; Rechts; Treble-kant; Boven; Overige
it: Posizione del componente per strumenti ad arco: Lato bassi; Centro; Anteriore; Sinistra; Inferiore; Non applicabile; Posteriore; Destra; Lato alti; Superiore; Altro
vi: Vị trí bè nhạc cụ dây trong dàn nhạc: Bên âm trầm; Giữa; Trước; Trái; Dưới; Không áp dụng; Sau; Phải; Bên âm bổng; Trên; Khác
en: Orchestral string instrument part position: Bass side; Center; Front; Left; Lower; Not applicable; Rear; Right; Treble side; Upper; Other
fi: Orkesterikielisoittimen osan sijainti: Bassopuoli; Keskellä; Edessä; Vasen; Alaosa; Ei sovellu; Takana; Oikea; Diskanttipuoli; Yläosa; Muu
zh-TW: 管弦樂弦樂器零件位置: 低音側; 中間; 前方; 左側; 較低位置; 不適用; 後方; 右側; 高音側; 較高位置; 其他
sl-SI: Položaj dela orkestralnega strunskega instrumenta: Basovska stran; Sredina; Sprednji; Levi; Spodnji; Se ne uporablja; Zadnji; Desni; Stran z visokimi toni; Zgornji; Drugo
es: Posición de la pieza para instrumento de cuerda orquestal: Lado de graves; Centro; Frente; Izquierda; Inferior; No aplica; Parte trasera; Derecha; Lado de agudos; Superior; Otro
pl: Ciąg znaków orkiestrowych pozycji części instrumentu: Strona basowa; Środek; Przód; Lewa; Dół; Nie dotyczy; Tył; Prawa; Strona wiolinowa; Góra; Inne
el: Ορχηστρική συμβολοσειρά instrument part position: Πλευρά μπάσων; Κέντρο; Μπροστά; Αριστερά; Κάτω; Δεν ισχύει; Πίσω; Δεξιά; Πλευρά πρίμων; Πάνω; Άλλο
sk-SK: Poloha dielu pre sláčikový nástroj: Basová strana; Stred; Predná; Ľavá; Dolná; Neuplatňuje sa; Zadná; Pravá; Výšková strana; Horná; Iné
hu: Vonós hangszer alkatrészének pozíciója: Basszus oldal; Közép; Elülső; Bal; Alsó; Nem alkalmazható; Hátsó; Jobb; Magas oldal; Felső; Egyéb
nb: Deleposisjon for orkesterstrengeinstrument: Basside; Senter; Front; Venstre; Nedre; Ikke aktuelt; Bak; Høyre; Diskantside; Øvre; Annet
sv: Orkesterstränginstrument – delens position: Bassida; Mitten; Fram; Vänster; Nedre; Ej tillämpligt; Bak; Höger; Diskantsida; Övre; Övrigt
pt-BR: Instrumento de cordas orquestral peça posição: Lado dos graves; Centro; Frente; Esquerda; Inferior; Não aplicável; Traseira; Direita; Lado dos agudos; Superior; Outros
ko: 관현악 현악기 부품 위치: 베이스 측면; 중앙; 전면; 왼쪽; 하단; 해당 없음; 후면; 오른쪽; 트레블 측면; 상단; 기타
ru: Положение детали оркестрового струнного инструмента: Басовая сторона; По центру; Спереди; Слева; Снизу; Неприменимо; Сзади; Справа; Дискантовая сторона; Сверху; Другое
tr: Orkestra yaylı çalgı parça konumu: Bas tarafı; Orta; Ön; Sol; Alt; Uygulanamaz; Arka; Sağ; Tiz tarafı; Üst; Diğer
lt-LT: Orkestrinio styginio instrumento dalies padėtis: Bosų pusė; Centras; Priekis; Kairė; Apatinė dalis; Netaikoma; Galinė dalis; Dešinė; Diskanto pusė; Viršutinė dalis; Kita
da: Placering af del på orkesterstrengeinstrument: Basside; Midt; Foran; Venstre; Nederst; Ikke relevant; Bagpå; Højre; Diskantside; Øverst; Andet
fr: Position de la pièce sur l’instrument à cordes d’orchestre: Côté des graves; Centre; Avant; Gauche; Inférieur; Sans objet; Arrière; Droite; Côté des aigus; Supérieur; Autre
ro-RO: Poziția piesei instrumentului orchestral cu coarde: Partea de bas; Centru; Față; Stânga; Inferior; Nu se aplică; Spate; Dreapta; Partea de sunete acute; Superior; Altele
cs: Poloha části koncertního smyčcového nástroje: Basová strana; Střed; Přední část; Levá strana; Dolní část; Nepoužije se; Zadní část; Pravá strana; Diskantová strana; Horní část; Ostatní